Washington statutes.
RCW 43.43.833

Background checks—State immunity.

If information is released under this chapter by the state of Washington, the state and its employees: (1) Make no representation that the subject of the inquiry has no criminal record or adverse civil or administrative decisions; (2) make no determination that the subject of the inquiry is suitable for involvement with a business or organization; and (3) are not liable for defamation, invasion of privacy, negligence, or any other claim in connection with any lawful dissemination of information.

[ 1997 c 392 s 529.]

NOTES:

Short title—Findings—Construction—Conflict with federal requirements—Part headings and captions not law—1997 c 392: See notes following RCW 74.39A.009.